Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 5 DISTRICT TRUSTEES
33-513. Professional personnel.

The board of trustees of each school district, including any specially chartered district, shall have the following powers and duties:

To employ professional personnel, on written contract in form approved by the state superintendent of public instruction, conditioned upon a valid certificate being held by such professional personnel at the time of entering upon the duties thereunder. Should the board of trustees fail to enter into written contract for the employment of any such person, the state superintendent of public instruction shall withhold ensuing apportionments until such written contract be entered into. When the board of trustees has delivered a proposed contract for the next ensuing year to any such person, such person shall have a period of time to be determined by the board of trustees in its discretion, but in no event less than ten (10) calendar days from the date the contract is delivered, in which to sign the contract and return it to the board. If the board of trustees does not make a determination as to how long the person has to sign and return the contract, the default time limit shall be twenty-one (21) calendar days after the contract is delivered to the person. Delivery of a contract may be made only in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested or electronically, return receipt requested. When delivery is made in person, delivery of the contract must be acknowledged by a signed receipt. When delivery is made by certified mail or electronically, delivery must be acknowledged by the return of the certified mail receipt or return electronic receipt from the person to whom the contract was sent. If the delivery is made electronically, with return electronic receipt, and the district has not received a return of a signed contract and has not received an electronic read receipt from the employee, the district shall then resend the original electronically delivered contract to the employee via certified mail, return receipt requested, and provide such individual with a new date for contract return. Should the person willfully refuse to acknowledge receipt of the contract or the contract is not signed and returned to the board in the designated period of time or if no designated period of time is set by the board, the default time, the board or its designee may declare the position vacant.

In the case of school districts other than elementary school districts, to employ a superintendent of schools for a term not to exceed three (3) years, who shall be the executive officer of the board of trustees with such powers and duties as the board may prescribe. The superintendent shall also act as the authorized representative of the district whenever such is required, unless some other person shall be named by the board of trustees to act as its authorized representative. The board of trustees shall conduct an annual, written formal evaluation of the work of the superintendent of the district to be completed no later than June 1. The evaluation shall indicate the strengths and weaknesses of the superintendent’s job performance in the year immediately preceding the evaluation and areas where improvement in the superintendent’s job performance, in the view of the board of trustees, is called for.
3. To employ through written contract principals who shall hold a valid certificate appropriate to the position for which they are employed, who shall supervise the operation and management of the school in accordance with the policies established by the board of trustees and who shall be under the supervision of the superintendent.

To employ through written contract principals who shall hold a valid certificate appropriate to the position for which they are employed, who shall supervise the operation and management of the school in accordance with the policies established by the board of trustees and who shall be under the supervision of the superintendent.

To employ assistant superintendents and principals for a term not to exceed two (2) years. Service performed under such contract shall be included in meeting the provisions of section 33-515, Idaho Code, as a teacher and persons eligible for a renewable contract as a teacher shall retain such eligibility. The superintendent, the superintendent’s designee, or in a school district that does not employ a superintendent, the board of trustees, shall conduct an annual, written evaluation of each such employee’s performance to be completed no later than June 1.

To suspend, grant leave of absence, place on probation or discharge certificated professional personnel for a material violation of any lawful rules or regulations of the board of trustees or of the state board of education, or for any conduct which could constitute grounds for revocation of a teaching certificate. Any certificated professional employee, except the superintendent, may be discharged during a contract term under the following procedures:

The superintendent or any other duly authorized administrative officer of the school district may recommend the discharge of any certificated employee by filing with the board of trustees written notice specifying the alleged reasons for discharge.

Upon receipt of such notice, the board, acting through its duly authorized administrative official, shall give the affected employee written notice of the allegations and the recommendation of discharge, along with written notice of a hearing before the board prior to any determination by the board of the truth of the allegations.

The hearing shall be scheduled to take place not less than six (6) days nor more than twenty-one (21) days after receipt of the notice by the employee. The date provided for the hearing may be changed by mutual consent.

The hearing shall be public unless the employee requests in writing that it be in executive session.

All testimony at the hearing shall be given under oath or affirmation. Any member of the board, or the clerk of the board, may administer oaths to witnesses or affirmations by witnesses.

The employee may be represented by legal counsel and/or by a representative of a local or state teachers association.

The chairman of the board or the designee of the chairman shall conduct the hearing.

The board shall cause an electronic record of the hearing to be made or shall employ a competent reporter to take stenographic or stenotype notes of all the testimony at the hearing. A transcript of the hearing shall be provided at cost by the board upon request of the employee.

At the hearing, the superintendent or other duly authorized administrative officer shall present evidence to substantiate the allegations contained in such notice.

The employee may produce evidence to refute the allegations. Any witness presented by the superintendent or by the employee shall be subject to cross-examination. The board may also examine witnesses and be represented by counsel.

The affected employee may file written briefs and arguments with the board within three (3) days after the close of the hearing or such other time as may be agreed upon by the affected employee and the board.

Within fifteen (15) days following the close of the hearing, the board shall determine and, acting through its duly authorized administrative official, shall notify the employee in writing whether the evidence presented at the hearing established the truth of the allegations and whether the employee is to be retained, immediately discharged, or discharged upon termination of the current contract.

If the employee appeals the decision of the board of trustees to the district court, the district court may affirm the board’s decision or set it aside and remand the matter to the board of trustees upon the following grounds and shall not set the same aside for any other grounds:

That the findings of fact are not based upon any substantial, competent evidence;

That the board of trustees has acted without jurisdiction or in excess of its authority; or

That the findings by the board of trustees as a matter of law do not support the decision.

The determination of the board of trustees shall be affirmed unless the court finds that the action of the board of trustees was:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the board;

Made upon unlawful procedure; or

Arbitrary, capricious or an abuse of discretion.

Record augmentation on appeal:

If, before the date set for any hearing at the district court, application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material, relates to the validity of the board action and that there was good cause for failure to present it in the proceeding before the board, then the court may remand the matter to the board with direction that the board receive additional evidence and conduct additional fact-finding;

Any party desiring to augment the transcript or record may file a motion in the same manner and pursuant to the same procedure for augmentation of the record in appeals to the supreme court; and

The board may modify its action by reason of the additional evidence and shall file any modifications, new findings or decisions with the reviewing court.

To grant an employee’s request for voluntary leave of absence. The board of trustees may delegate ongoing authority to grant an employee’s request for voluntary leave of absence to the district’s superintendent or other designee. Upon the superintendent or designee’s granting of an employee’s request for voluntary leave of absence, the board shall ratify or nullify the action at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

To delegate to the superintendent or other designee the ongoing authority to place any employee on a period of involuntary leave of absence should the superintendent or designee believe that such action is in the best interest of the district. Upon the superintendent or designee’s action to place a certificated employee on a period of involuntary leave of absence, the board shall ratify or nullify the action of the superintendent or designee at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board or at a special meeting of the board should the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board not be within a period of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the action.
(a) Where there is a criminal court order preventing the certificated employee from being in the presence of minors or students, preventing the employee from being in the presence of any other adult individual employed at the school or detaining the employee in prison or jail, the certificated employee’s involuntary leave of absence shall be without pay due to the certificated employee’s inability to perform the essential functions of the employee’s position. Without such a condition or situation, the involuntary leave of absence shall be with pay.

Where there is a criminal court order preventing the certificated employee from being in the presence of minors or students, preventing the employee from being in the presence of any other adult individual employed at the school or detaining the employee in prison or jail, the certificated employee’s involuntary leave of absence shall be without pay due to the certificated employee’s inability to perform the essential functions of the employee’s position. Without such a condition or situation, the involuntary leave of absence shall be with pay.

During the period of involuntary leave of absence without pay, the salary of the certificated employee will be maintained in a district-managed account. Should the certificated employee return to the district for active employment subsequent to the removal or dismissal of the court order, acquittal or adjudication of innocence, the district shall remit the salary funds, less the cost incurred by the district for the substitute hired to replace the certificated employee. Further, should the certificated employee return to the district under the provisions established in this subsection, the district shall arrange to have the certificated employee credited with the public employee retirement system of Idaho (PERSI) for the certificated employee’s time away from work during the period of leave of absence.

During the period of involuntary leave of absence, the district shall continue to pay the district’s portion of monthly costs associated with the certificated employee’s health insurance benefits. The assumption of this payment by the district shall not alter the certificated employee’s financial obligations, if any, under the policy.

Should there be dual court orders preventing more than one (1) employee from being in the presence of one (1) or more other employees, all employees subject to the court order shall be excluded from the school pursuant to subsection 7.(a) of this section.

If the period of involuntary leave of absence is due to the district’s need to conduct an investigation into the conduct of the certificated employee, and there are no related criminal investigation(s) and/or criminal charges of any nature pending, the administration shall complete its investigation within a period of sixty (60) working days. On or before the sixtieth working day, the administrative leave shall either cease and the certificated employee shall be returned to his position of employment or the administration shall advance a personnel recommendation to the board of trustees. If a recommendation is advanced, the involuntary leave of absence shall continue until such time as the district board has made its decision in regard to the personnel recommendation with such decision effectively concluding the involuntary leave of absence. If a related criminal investigation is occurring and/or criminal charges are pending, the district shall not be bound to any limitation as to the duration of involuntary leave of absence. The timelines established in this section may be waived or modified by mutual agreement.

The board of trustees shall withhold the salary of any teacher who does not hold a teaching certificate valid in this state. It shall not contract to require any teacher to make up time spent in attending any meeting called by the state board of education or by the state superintendent of public instruction; nor while attending regularly scheduled official meetings of the state teachers association.

No contract shall be issued for the next ensuing year until such time as the employee’s formal written performance evaluation has been completed.

If applicable student data relating to Idaho’s standards achievement test has not been received by the district within thirty (30) days of the deadline to complete the formal written performance evaluation for district employees, the school district or charter school shall utilize one (1) of the other objective measures of growth in student achievement as determined by the board of trustees or governing board, not including Idaho’s standards achievement test, in order to complete the required student achievement component of performance evaluations.

33-513A. Professional personnel contracts for 2012-2013 school year. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2013, ch. 140, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

33-514. Issuance of annual contracts — Support programs — Categories of contracts — Optional placement.

The board of trustees shall establish criteria and procedures for the supervision and evaluation of certificated employees who are not employed on a renewable contract, as provided for in section 33-515, Idaho Code.

There shall be three (3) categories of annual contracts available to local school districts under which to employ certificated personnel:

A category 1 contract is a limited one-year contract as provided in section 33-514A, Idaho Code.

A category 2 contract is for certificated personnel in the first and second years of continuous employment with the same school district. Upon the decision by a local school board not to reemploy the person for the following year, the certificated employee shall be provided a written statement of reasons for non-reemployment by no later than the first day of July. No property rights shall attach to a category 2 contract and therefore the employee shall not be entitled to a review by the local board of the reasons or decision not to reemploy.

A category 3 contract is for certificated personnel during the third year of continuous employment by the same school district. When any such employee’s work is found to be unsatisfactory, a defined period of probation shall be established by the board, but in no case shall a probationary period be less than eight (8) weeks. After the probationary period, action shall be taken by the board as to whether the employee is to be retained, immediately discharged, discharged upon termination of the current contract or reemployed at the end of the contract term under a continued probationary status. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 74-205 and 74-206, Idaho Code, a decision to place certificated personnel on probationary status may be made in executive session and the employee shall not be named in the minutes of the meeting. A record of the decision shall be placed in the employee’s personnel file. This procedure shall not preclude recognition of unsatisfactory work at a subsequent evaluation and the establishment of a reasonable period of probation. In all instances, the employee shall be duly notified in writing of the areas of work that are deficient, including the conditions of probation. Each such certificated employee on a category 3 contract shall be given notice, in writing, whether he or she will be reemployed for the next ensuing year. Such notice shall be given by the board of trustees no later than the first day of July of each such year. If the board of trustees has decided not to reemploy the certificated employee, then the notice must contain a statement of reasons for such decision and the employee shall, upon request, be given the opportunity for an informal review of such decision by the board of trustees. The parameters of an informal review shall be determined by the local board.

School districts hiring an employee who has been on renewable contract status with another Idaho district, or has out-of-state experience which would otherwise qualify the certificated employee for renewable contract status in Idaho, shall have the option to immediately grant renewable contract status, or to place the employee on a category 3 annual contract. Such employment on a category 3 contract under the provisions of this subsection may be for one (1), two (2) or three (3) years.

33-514A. Issuance of limited contract — Category 1 contract.

After August 1, or pursuant to section 33-507(3), Idaho Code, the board of trustees may exercise the option of employing certified personnel on a one (1) year limited contract, which may also be referred to as a category 1 contract consistent with the provisions of section 33-514, Idaho Code. Such a contract is specifically offered for the limited duration of the ensuing school year, and no further notice is required by the district to terminate the contract at the conclusion of the contract year.

33-515. Issuance of renewable contracts.

During the third full year of continuous employment by the same school district, including any specially chartered district, each certificated employee named in subsection (32) of section 33-1001, Idaho Code, and each school nurse and school librarian shall be evaluated for a renewable contract and shall, upon having been offered a contract for the next ensuing year, and upon signing and timely returning a contract for a fourth full year, be placed on a renewable contract status with said school district entitling such individual to the right to automatic renewal of contract, subject to the provisions included in this chapter, provided that instructional staff who have not obtained a professional endorsement under section 33-1201A, Idaho Code, may not be placed on a renewable contract status, provided however, if the career ladder pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, is not funded, then a professional endorsement shall not be required.

At least once annually, the performance of each renewable contract certificated employee, school nurse, or school librarian shall be evaluated according to criteria and procedures established by the board of trustees in accordance with general guidelines approved by the state board of education. Such an evaluation shall be completed no later than June 1 of each year. The evaluation shall include a minimum of two (2) documented observations, one (1) of which shall be completed prior to January 1 of each year.

Any contract automatically renewed under the provisions of this section may be renewed for a shorter term, longer term or the same length of term as stated in the current contract and at a greater, lesser or equal salary as that stated in the current contract. Absent the board’s application of a formal reduction in force, renewals of standard teacher contracts may be for a shorter term, longer term or the same length of term as stated in the current standard teacher contract and at a greater, lesser or equal salary, and shall be uniformly applied to all employees based upon the district’s adopted salary schedule to the extent allowable in section 33-1004E, Idaho Code.

Contracts issued pursuant to this section shall be issued on or before the first day of July each year.

At the discretion of the board, the district may issue letters of intent for employment for the next ensuing school year to renewable contract status employees during May of each school year. Such letter of intent shall not state a specific duration of the contract or salary/benefits term for the next ensuing school year.

Unless otherwise negotiated and ratified by both parties pursuant to sections 33-1271, et seq., Idaho Code, standard teacher renewals for terms shorter in length than that stated in the current standard contract of renewable certificated employees, should be considered and implemented only after the district has determined that the salary-based apportionment reimbursement that it estimates it will receive for the ensuing school year is less than the sum the district would otherwise be paying for salaries for certificated professional employees.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the board of trustees from offering a renewed contract increasing the salary of any certificated person, or from reassigning an administrative employee to a nonadministrative position with appropriate reduction of salary from the preexisting salary level. In the event the board of trustees reassigns an administrative employee to a nonadministrative position, the board shall give written notice to the employee that contains a statement of the reasons for the reassignment. The employee, upon written request to the board, shall be entitled to an informal review of that decision. The process and procedure for the informal review shall be determined by the local board of trustees.

Before a board of trustees can determine not to renew for reasons of an unsatisfactory report of the performance of any certificated person whose contract would otherwise be automatically renewed, such person shall be entitled to a reasonable period of probation. This period of probation shall be preceded by a written notice from the board of trustees with reasons for such probationary period and with provisions for adequate supervision and evaluation of the person’s performance during the probationary period. Such period of probation shall not affect the person’s renewable contract status. Consideration of probationary status for certificated personnel is consideration of the status of an employee within the meaning of section 74-206, Idaho Code, and may be held in executive session. If the consideration results in probationary status, the individual on probation shall not be named in the minutes of the meeting. A record of the decision shall be placed in the teacher’s personnel file.

If the board of trustees takes action to immediately discharge or discharge upon termination of the current contract a certificated person whose contract would otherwise be automatically renewed, the action of the board shall be consistent with the procedures specified in section 33-513(5), Idaho Code, and furthermore, the board shall notify the employee in writing whether there is just and reasonable cause not to renew the contract or to reduce the salary of the affected employee, and if so, what reasons it relied upon in that determination.

If the board of trustees takes action after the declaration of a financial emergency pursuant to section 33-522, Idaho Code, and such action is directed at more than one (1) certificated employee, and if mutually agreed to by both parties, a single informal review shall be conducted. Without mutual consent of both parties, the board of trustees shall use the following procedure to conduct a single due process hearing within sixty-seven (67) days of the declaration of financial emergency pursuant to section 33-522(2), Idaho Code, or on or before June 22, whichever shall occur first:

The superintendent or any other duly authorized administrative officer of the school district may recommend the change in the length of the term stated in the current contract or reduce the salary of any certificated employee by filing with the board of trustees written notice specifying the purported reasons for such changes.

Upon receipt of such notice, the board of trustees, acting through its duly authorized administrative official, shall give the affected employees written notice of the reductions and the recommendation of the change in the length of the term stated in the current contract or the reduction of salary, along with written notice of a hearing before the board of trustees prior to any determination by the board of trustees.

The hearing shall be scheduled to take place not less than six (6) days nor more than fourteen (14) days after receipt of the notice by the employees. The date provided for the hearing may be changed by mutual consent.

The hearing shall be open to the public.

All testimony at the hearing shall be given under oath or affirmation. Any member of the board, or the clerk of the board of trustees, may administer oaths to witnesses or affirmations by witnesses.

The employees may be represented by legal counsel and/or by a representative of a local or state education association.

The chairman of the board of trustees or the designee of the chairman shall conduct the hearing.

The board of trustees shall cause an electronic record of the hearing to be made or shall employ a competent reporter to take stenographic or stenotype notes of all the testimony at the hearing. A transcript of the hearing shall be provided at cost by the board of trustees upon request of the employee.

At the hearing, the superintendent or other duly authorized administrative officer shall present evidence to substantiate the reduction contained in such notice.

The employees may produce evidence to refute the reduction. Any witness presented by the superintendent or by the employees shall be subject to cross-examination. The board of trustees may also examine witnesses and be represented by counsel.

The affected employees may file written briefs and arguments with the board of trustees within three (3) days after the close of the hearing or such other time as may be agreed upon by the affected employees and the board of trustees.

Within seven (7) days following the close of the hearing, the board of trustees shall determine and, acting through its duly authorized administrative official, shall notify the employees in writing whether the evidence presented at the hearing established the need for the action taken.

If the board of trustees, for reasons other than unsatisfactory service, for the ensuing contract year, determines to change the length of the term stated in the current contract, reduce the salary or not renew the contract of a certificated person whose contract would otherwise be automatically renewed, nothing herein shall require a probationary period.

If the board of trustees, for reasons other than unsatisfactory service, for the ensuing contract year, determines to change the length of the term stated in the current contract or reduce the salary of a certificated person whose contract would otherwise be automatically renewed, nothing herein shall require any individualized due process proceeding. In such circumstance, the board shall hold a single informal review for all impacted employees. The process and procedure for the single informal review shall be determined by the local board of trustees.

The due process hearing pursuant to this subsection shall not be required if the board of trustees and the local education association reach an agreement on issues agreed upon pursuant to section 33-522(3), Idaho Code.

33-515A. Supplemental contracts.

In addition to the provisions of sections 33-514, 33-514A and 33-515, Idaho Code, a board of trustees may enter into supplemental contracts to provide extra duty or extra day assignments for certificated employees.

An extra duty assignment is, and extra duty supplemental contracts may be used for, an assignment which is not part of a certificated employee’s regular teaching duties. Any such contract shall be separate and apart from the certificated employee’s underlying contract, and no property rights shall attach to a supplemental extra duty contract. If a board of trustees determines not to reissue a supplemental extra duty contract, the board shall give written notice to the employee describing reasons for the decision not to reissue. The employee, upon written request to the board, shall be entitled to an informal review. The process and procedure for informal review shall be determined by the board of trustees. Should a board of trustees provide for additional procedures, nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit those procedures. The contract shall be in a form approved by the state superintendent of public instruction.

An extra day assignment is, and supplemental extra day contracts may be used for, an assignment of days of service in addition to the standard contract length used for the majority of certificated employees in the district. Such additional days may be in service of the same activities as the certificated employee’s regular teaching duties. Any such extra day contracts shall provide the same daily rate of pay and rights to due process and procedures as provided by the certificated employee’s underlying contract. The contract shall be in a form approved by the state superintendent of public instruction.

For the purposes of this section, “underlying contract” means either a category 1, 2, 3 or renewable contract.

33-515B. Reduced enrollment

Contract termination and severance stipend. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to rejection of Proposition 1 on November 6, 2012.

33-516. Right to renewable contract when district is divided, consolidated or reorganized.

If, by reason of the division of a school district, including any specially chartered district, or by reason of the consolidation of such a district with another district, or other districts, or by reason of the reorganization of such a district, the position held by any teacher entitled to a renewable contract is transferred from the control of one board of trustees to the control of a new or different board of trustees, the right to automatic renewal is not thereby lost, and such new or different board of trustees shall be subject to all of the provisions of this chapter with respect to such teacher in the same manner as if such teacher were its employee and had been its employee during the time such teacher was actually employed by the board of trustees from whose control the position was transferred.

33-517. Noncertificated personnel.

The board of trustees of each school district, including any specially chartered district and any Idaho public charter school, shall have the following powers and duties:

To provide that hiring and evaluation procedures for noncertificated personnel shall be in writing and shall be available for any noncertificated employee’s review during regular business hours. Job descriptions for all noncertificated employees shall be written and shall be made available to employees of the district or other people seeking employment.

To provide a grievance procedure for noncertificated employees of the district which meets the minimum standards of paragraphs (a) through (i) of this subsection. In the event a grievance procedure is not provided, the following grievance procedure shall apply.

A grievance shall be defined as a written allegation of:

A violation of current written board approved school district policy;

A violation of current written school procedures;

A violation of the current written board approved employee handbook;

A condition or conditions that jeopardize the health or safety of the employee or another; or

Tasks assigned outside of the employee’s essential job functions and for which the employee has no specialized training.

If a noncertificated employee files a grievance, the employee shall submit the grievance in writing to the district’s human resources administrator within six (6) working days of the incident giving rise to the grievance. The grievance shall state the nature of the grievance and the remedy sought. Within six (6) working days of receipt of the grievance, the district’s human resources administrator shall schedule an informal grievance meeting with the grievant, the employee against whom the grievance is filed, respective advocates, as well as a district administrator who will not be involved in the statutory grievance process. The purpose of the meeting shall be to attempt to find a resolution to the employee grievance.

If a resolution is not reached during the informal grievance meeting, the individual against whom a grievance is filed shall file a written response to the employee grievance within six (6) working days after the conclusion of the informal grievance meeting. Thereafter, the employee may appeal the grievance to the superintendent of the district or the superintendent’s designee within six (6) working days of the receipt of the written response or within six (6) working days from the date the written response was due if the noncertificated employee received no written response. Within six (6) working days of an appeal, the superintendent or his designee shall provide a written response to the noncertificated employee.

If the noncertificated employee is not satisfied with the response of the superintendent or the designee, or if there is no response by the superintendent or the designee within the time frame provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section, the noncertificated employee may request a review of the grievance by a hearing panel within six (6) working days from receipt of the response provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section if the employee received a written response, or six (6) working days from the date the superintendent or designee last had to respond if the noncertificated employee received no written response. Within ten (10) working days of receipt of an appeal, a panel consisting of three (3) persons; one (1) designated by the superintendent, one (1) designated by the employee, and one (1) agreed upon by the two (2) appointed members [shall convene] for the purpose of reviewing the appeal. Within ten (10) working days following completion of the review, the panel shall submit its decision in writing to the noncertificated employee, the superintendent, and the board of trustees.
(e) The panel’s decision shall be the final and conclusive resolution of the grievance unless the board of trustees overturns the panel’s decision by resolution at the board of trustees’ next regularly scheduled public meeting or unless, within forty-two (42) calendar days of the filing of the board’s decision, either party appeals to the district court in the county where the school district is located. Upon appeal of a decision of the board of trustees, the district court may affirm or set aside and remand the matter to the board of trustees upon the following grounds, and shall not set the same aside on any other grounds:

The panel’s decision shall be the final and conclusive resolution of the grievance unless the board of trustees overturns the panel’s decision by resolution at the board of trustees’ next regularly scheduled public meeting or unless, within forty-two (42) calendar days of the filing of the board’s decision, either party appeals to the district court in the county where the school district is located. Upon appeal of a decision of the board of trustees, the district court may affirm or set aside and remand the matter to the board of trustees upon the following grounds, and shall not set the same aside on any other grounds:

That the findings of fact are not based on any substantial, competent evidence;

That the board of trustees has acted without jurisdiction or in excess of its powers;

That the findings by the board of trustees as a matter of law do not support the decision.

Standards and procedures for the storage, administration and disposal of an epinephrine auto-injector; and

Emergency follow-up procedures.

A noncertificated employee filing a grievance pursuant to this section shall be entitled to a representative of the employee’s choice at each step of the grievance procedure provided in this section. The person against whom the grievance is filed, the superintendent or the superintendent’s designee shall be entitled to a representative at each step of the grievance procedure. None of these individuals will be qualified to sit on the advisory grievance panel.

The timelines of the grievance procedure established in this section may be waived or modified by mutual agreement.

Utilization of the grievance procedure established pursuant to this section shall not constitute a waiver of any right of appeal available pursuant to law or regulation.

Neither the board nor any member of the administration shall take reprisals affecting the employment status of any party in interest. The employee filing a grievance shall not take any reprisals regarding the course of the outcome of the grievance nor take any reprisals against any party or witness participating in the grievance.

A noncertificated employee of a school district shall be provided a personnel file consistent with the provisions of section 33-518, Idaho Code.

A noncertificated employee of the district may file a grievance about any matter related to his or her employment, only if it directly relates to any of the grounds for a grievance provided for in paragraph (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection. However, neither the rate of salary or wage of the employee nor the decision to terminate an employee for cause during the initial one hundred eighty (180) days of employment shall be a proper subject for consideration under the grievance procedure provided in this section. For the purposes of this section, “current” means as of the date of the incident giving rise to the grievance.

33-517A. School districts — Noncertificated employees — Group health insurance.

The board of trustees of each school district, including any specially chartered district, shall provide the same group health insurance benefits to all noncertificated employees who work twenty (20) hours or more per week, as provided to certificated employees.